Washington statutes.
RCW 36.55.010

Pipe line and wire line franchises on county roads.

Any board of county commissioners may grant franchises to persons or private or municipal corporations to use the right-of-way of county roads in their respective counties for the construction and maintenance of waterworks, gas pipes, telephone, telegraph, and electric light lines, sewers and any other such facilities.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.55.010. Prior: 1961 c 55 s 2; prior: 1937 c 187 s 38, part; RRS s 6450-38, part.]